District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Ward 8 Recreation Facility Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 3(a)(2)(D) of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007
(D.C. Law 16-234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.02(a)(2)(D)), is amended to read as follows:
“(D) Maintain net zero energy compliance unless:
“(i) The project is for the installation of temporary structures;
“(ii) The project is for an indoor pool at a recreation center in Ward 8 and such
indoor pool shall be built to at least LEED Silver standards as determined by the Department of
Buildings; or
“(iii) The project is for a recreation center in Ward 8 with an indoor gym.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.